North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-25 Dairy Product Regulation
4.1-25-39.
Sale of foods not imitation milk, imitation milk products, or filled dairy products.

This chapter does not prohibit the manufacture or sale of proprietary foods that are clearly not imitation milk, imitation milk products, or filled dairy products; which do not contain imitation milk, imitation milk product, or filled dairy product; and which are not conducive to substitution, confusion, deception, and fraud upon the purchasers of milk, milk products, or filled dairy products by their manufacture or sale.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-40.
Shared animal ownership agreement — Raw milk.

It is not a violation of this chapter to transfer or obtain raw milk under a shared animal ownership agreement. A person may not resell raw milk or raw milk products obtained under a shared animal ownership agreement.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-41.
Labeling and identity standards.

A person who sells milk or milk products at retail in the state shall comply with the labeling standards and standards of identity set forth in 21 U.S.C. 343(q)(r) and in rules adopted by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-42.
Reports — Blanks — When made — Contents.

The commissioner shall furnish blanks to all licensed creameries, cheese factories, condenseries, drying plants, ice cream plants, ice milk plants, milk plants, and producer-distributors for the purpose of making a report of the amount of milk and milk products handled. Each proprietor or manager of those businesses shall report to the commissioner on the last days of June and of December of each year, or immediately upon cessation of operation, the pounds [kilograms] of butterfat in cream, the pounds [kilograms] of manufacturing grade milk, and the pounds [kilograms] of bottling milk purchased during the period covered by the report, the aggregate amount paid for each, the number of pounds [kilograms] of butter and cheese, and the number of gallons [liters] of ice cream and ice milk manufactured during such period.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-43.
Test results disputes.

If a disagreement between a seller and a buyer or the legal representatives of both or either arises over the percentage of butterfat contained in any quantity of milk sold or offered for sale at the request of the owner and in the owner’s presence, a sample of the milk obtained as provided in section 4.1-25-27 and mutually agreed upon by the interested parties as being a representative sample must be sealed and mailed by the buyer to the office of the commissioner. Each sample mailed to the commissioner must include a statement giving the name and address of the seller and the buyer of the milk in question, the net weight, the percentage and amount of butterfat contained, the price per pound [.45 kilogram] for butterfat, and the amount of money paid or offered in payment for the same and bearing the signature of the seller and the buyer. The commissioner shall determine the percentage of butterfat contained in the sample and shall report of the result in triplicate, the original to be filed in the commissioner’s office, one copy to be sent to the seller, and one to the buyer of the milk. The percentage of butterfat determined and reported constitutes the “official butterfat test” and is the basis on which final settlement must be made. The fee for the official butterfat test and any other tests required must be in an amount as set by rule of the commissioner, considering the actual costs of the test, and the fee must be mailed to the commissioner at the time of forwarding the sample for the official butterfat or other test.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-44.
Test sample disputes.

If the buyer and seller do not agree upon a sample of milk as provided in section 4.1-25-43, the party selling or offering for sale that milk may require that the buyer or prospective buyer to forward the sample taken to the department in compliance with section 4.1-25-27. Each sample so forwarded must include an affidavit from the buyer or prospective buyer, stating that the sample was taken in compliance with the provisions of section 4.1-25-27, and the statement must contain all information required in section 4.1-25-43, except that the signature of the seller is not required. Each sample must be tested and reported on as prescribed in section 4.1-25-43, and the percentage of butterfat determined and reported constitutes the “official butterfat test” and is the basis on which final settlement must be made.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-45.
Standards considered minimum — Municipality may provide more stringent standards.

The standards in this chapter constitute only minimum standards. This chapter may not be construed to prevent any municipality from providing, by ordinance, more stringent or comprehensive standards than are contained within this chapter. Neither this chapter nor in the rules of the commissioner may be construed to prevent any person concerned with the dairy business from using standards, inspections, or other practices or procedures that are more stringent or comprehensive.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-46.
Fees and penalties collected to be placed in general fund.

All fees and penalties collected under this chapter must be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the general fund.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-47.
Disposal of illegal milk or milk products — Seizure.

Any milk or cream offered for sale in violation of any provision of this chapter or the rules of the commissioner must be colored with a harmless food coloring and returned to the seller. In addition, any milk or milk product that is in violation of any provision of this chapter or the rules of the commissioner may be seized or ordered held by the commissioner and must be disposed of as any other illegal food or drug as provided in chapter 19-02.1.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-48.
Penalty for violation of chapter — Additional civil penalty — Failure to pay civil penalty.

A person violating any provision of this chapter or any rule or order of the commissioner, for which another criminal penalty is not specifically provided is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. In addition, a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars per day for each violation or continuing violation may be imposed. The civil penalty may be imposed by the courts in a civil proceeding or by the commissioner through an administrative hearing under chapter 28-32. If a civil penalty is imposed by the commissioner through an administrative hearing and the civil penalty is not paid, the commissioner may collect the civil penalty by a civil proceeding in any appropriate court. The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter for failure to pay a civil penalty within thirty days after a final determination is made that the civil penalty is owed. The commissioner may refuse to renew or issue a license if the licensee or license applicant has repeatedly violated the provisions of this chapter or rules or orders of the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-49.
State’s attorney’s endorsement to complaint unnecessary upon violation of chapter.

A complaint made for a violation of this chapter does not require the endorsement of the state’s attorney, but when the court hearing a complaint made is satisfied of the truthfulness of the complaint, the court shall issue a warrant.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-50.
Rules.

The commissioner may adopt rules under chapter 28-32 to implement this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-51.
Shared animal ownership agreement rules limitation.

Notwithstanding chapter 28-32, the commissioner may not adopt any rule that restricts, limits, or imposes additional requirements on any person transferring or obtaining raw milk in accordance with the terms of a shared animal ownership agreement.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-25-52.
Enforcement.

The commissioner shall administer and supervise the enforcement of this chapter, provide for periodic inspections and investigations deemed necessary to ensure compliance with this chapter or the rules under this chapter, receive and provide for the investigation of complaints; and provide for the institution and prosecution of civil or criminal actions or both. This chapter and the rules under this chapter may be enforced by injunction in any court having jurisdiction to grant injunctive relief. Filled dairy products, imitation milk, or imitation milk products, illegally held or otherwise in violation of this chapter may be seized and disposed under an appropriate court order.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.